Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,145
Effect of local planning, zoning, sanitary, and building laws.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all developments are subject to the planning, zoning, sanitary, and building laws applicable to the locality in which the development is located.

(2) In order to facilitate development, redevelopment, and other activities in furtherance of the purposes of the Nebraska Housing Agency Act by local housing agencies and their affiliates, a city or county may grant exceptions to the requirements of (a) zoning ordinances and other laws, resolutions, ordinances, and regulations regulating the use, development, and improvement of land or buildings, (b) laws, resolutions, ordinances, and regulations pertaining to historic buildings and structures, and (c) redevelopment plans, comprehensive plans, and other plans governing city or county land use. Any such exceptions shall not compromise essential health and safety standards. The provisions of this section shall be cumulative of, and not in limitation of, any existing laws, resolutions, ordinances, and regulations that permit variances, special exceptions, and other relief from applicable requirements relating to development and improvement of real property.

(3) With respect to matters relating to the purposes of the act, each city or county or regional planning body of the state may, in its planning processes, take into account the recommendations of local housing agencies formed by such city or county, or by the cities and counties affected by the actions of such regional planning body.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 74.